ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATELTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATENA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATENAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATENI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATENIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATES
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATESKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATESSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATESSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATEST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATESTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATETA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATETAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMATKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUMGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUNA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUNAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUNI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUNIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSED
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEID
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEILE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEILEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEILGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEILT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEILTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEINA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEINAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEINI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEINIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEISKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEISSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEISSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEIST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEISTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEITA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEITAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSELTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSENA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSENAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSENI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSENIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSES
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSESKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSESSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSESSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSEST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSESTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSETA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSETAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSILE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSILEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSILGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSILT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSILTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSINA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSINAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSINI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSINIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSISKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSISSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSISSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSIST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSISTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSITA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSITAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTELTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTENA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTENAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTENI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTENIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTES
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTESKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTESSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTESSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTEST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTESTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTETA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTETAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUSTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEGA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEGAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEL
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTELE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTELEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTELGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTELT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTELTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTENA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTENAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTENI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTENIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTES
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTESKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTESSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTESSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTEST
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTESTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTETA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTETAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUTKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUVAT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DUVATKI
	A N U D	>	-NUD,GE
	A N U D	>	-NUD,GEGI
	A N U D	>	-NUD,GEM
	A N U D	>	-NUD,GEMGI
	A N U D	>	-NUD,GU
	A N U D	>	-NUD,GUGI

# rule/flag 36 (affects 34432 words, has 15 subrules):
flag e:
	I G A	>	-GA,D
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,ID
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,IKS
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,IL
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,ILE
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,ILT
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,IS
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,ISSE
	[AE] G A	>	-GA,IST
	U G A	>	-GA,L
	U G A	>	-GA,LT
	U G A	>	-GA,S
	U G A	>	-GA,SSE
	U G A	>	-GA,ST
	N U D	>	-UD,GI
