ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
ablastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
adenoidsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
aegsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
agiteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ahkega/abcdefhjklmnoy
ainuga/acemy
akropoliga/acefijkly
akvarellinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
algebraga/abcdefgikmnoy
allotroopsusega/abehklmny
ambroosiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
ampiiriga/acefijkly
anastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
animistlikuga/acdegjlmy
antinoomiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
apeksiga/abcehijlmoy
aprikoosiga/acefijkly
arestiga/acefijkly
arkustangensiga/abcehijlmoy
artikulatsioonilisusega/abehklmny
asfaldisusega/abehklmny
assürioloogiga/acefijkly
asuuriga/acefijkly
atskoiga/acejl
austraalsusega/abehklmny
avansiga/aceijly
baleriiniga/acefijkly
barüsfääriga/acefijkly
bermiga/acefijkly
binokleiga/acejl
blufitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
brahmaaniga/acefijkly
brüoloogiga/acefijkly
bülletääniga/acefijkly
deemonlikuga/acdegjlmy
deklaratiivsusega/abehklmny
demonstrandiga/aceijly
deskriptoriga/abcehijlmoy
diagnostikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
digitaliseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
direktorlikuga/acdegjlmy
distinktiivsusega/abehklmny
dolomiidiga/aceijly
drillinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
dşiibiga/aceijly
eelnenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ehedusega/abehiklmny
eksaminandiga/acefijkly
ekspediitoriga/abcehijlmoy
ekstravagantsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
elegantsusega/abehklmny
emakaga/abcdefgikmnoy
endokardiga/acefijkly
epakusega/abehklmny
erandeiga/acejl
erudiitsusega/abehklmny
essuga/acdeghimy
eudaimonistlikuga/acdegjlmy
fabiaanlikuga/acdegjlmy
farmakoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
fenüüliga/acefijkly
fillereiga/acejl
flekteerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
fookusega/abehiklmny
fotograafiga/acefijkly
frivoolsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
föönikseiga/acejl
gambiidiga/aceijly
genitiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
gletğeriga/abcehijlmoy
grafiidiga/aceijly
grotiga/aceijly
haardega/abehiklmny
haiglasega/abdehjklmnoy
haledusega/abehiklmny
hambunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hardusega/abehiklmny
harvemusega/abehklmny
hedonismiga/acefijkly
heksagooniga/acefijkly
helistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hematuuriaga/abcdefgikmnoy
heteromorfsusega/abehklmny
hiljunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hirnahtanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
homeerilisusega/abehklmny
huiklevusega/abehklmny
häbistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
häärberiga/abcehijlmoy
hübriidiga/acefijkly
hüüvisega/abehiklmny
igisusega/abehklmny
iidsusega/abehklmny
imiteeringuga/abcdefgikmoy
inertsiga/acefijkly
inspitsiendiga/aceijly
invaliidiga/acefijkly
istuga/acdeghimy
jamsiga/aceijly
joonestikuga/acdegimy
jumalustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jälitatavaga/abcdefgijklmnoy
jäätmega/abcefhiklmny
kaadiga/abcefhijkly
kadakasusega/abehklmny
kahlakuga/abcdefgikmoy
kaldaga/abcefikny
kamakaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kannuga/acem
karakteriseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
karmaniga/abcehijlmoy
kastoreiga/acejl
katvusega/abehiklmny
keemisega/abehiklmny
kelkavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kestvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kiibitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kikutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kinnistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kitiga/aceijly
klassilisusega/abehklmny
kloğitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kogukondlasega/abehiklmny
kokainistiga/acefijkly
kolmikuga/abcdefgikmoy
kompamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
konduktoriga/abcehijlmoy
konstitutiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
koobardeiga/acejl
kootamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
korpuskulaarsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
kougituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
krelliga/acefjklny
krobisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
krõksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kukumusega/abehklmny
kunstilisusega/abehklmny
kusijaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kuğetiga/aceijly
käitunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kärutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõhnetunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõngutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõõksuga/acdeghimy
külimituga/acdegimy
küünitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
laekureiga/acejl
laiandeiga/acejl
lameiga/acejl
lasnuga/acemy
laviiniga/acefijkly
leidusega/abehiklmny
lepasusega/abehklmny
lihastikuga/acdegimy
liitiumiga/abcefhijklmoy
lipiga/aceijly
loetuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
lolliga/acefijklny
loosungeiga/acejl
lukuga/acdegimy
lähedusega/abehiklmny
läätsjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lõmpsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lörtsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
maaksega/abcdefhjklmnoy
mahlasusega/abehklmny
maliga/acefijkly
markantsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
matriarhaalsusega/abehklmny
meiliga/acefijkly
metallistiga/acefijkly
miljoneiga/acejl
modulaarsusega/abehklmny
mopsiga/acefijkly
mulatiga/aceijly
murtavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
mädanikulisusega/abehklmny
mätskusega/abehklmny
mõrsjaga/abcdefgikmnoy
mühinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
naaklejaga/abcdefgkmnoy
naljandiga/abcehijlmoy
neetavusega/abehklmny
nihvakuga/abcdefgikmoy
nivoiga/acejl
norminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nurmikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
näitusega/abehiklmny
nääklevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
nörritanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ohakasusega/abehklmny
olemeiga/acejl
operatsiooniga/acefijkly
orkestreeringuga/abcdefgikmoy
ovaloidiga/acefijkly
pahnasega/abdehjklmnoy
pakutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
panditiga/abcehijlmoy
parameetreiga/acejl
partselliga/acefijkly
paudituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
peidetamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
perkaleiga/acejl
pigistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
piiskavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
pimedikuga/acdegimy
pistikuga/abcdefgikmoy
platsdarmiga/acefijkly
plõnksutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
polükroomiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
porditavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
prahitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
prikaasiga/acefijkly
proletariaadiga/aceijly
prullakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
pugalaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
pulbristanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
purjestikuga/acdegimy
puändikusega/abehklmny
põdruga/acem
põminaga/abcdefgikmnoy
pügalalisusega/abehklmny
raaminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rahvaga/abcefiknxy
raplematuga/abcdefgkmoy
ravinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
refrääniga/acefijkly
relvastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
restoraniga/acefijkly
rihmutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ripsjusega/abehklmny
rohususega/abehiklmny
rootsistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rutiiniga/acefijkly
räpasusega/abehklmny
rõõskjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
rüütellikuga/acdegjlmy
sagedaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
saltseriga/abcehijlmoy
sarkofaagiga/acefijkly
seedinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
seitsmesega/abdehjklmnoy
senateiga/acejl
setmendaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
siiluga/acdeghimy
sindleiga/acejl
sitemusega/abehklmny
slavofiilsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
solipsistiga/acefijkly
soonjusega/abehklmny
spektaakleiga/acejl
standardsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
stopriga/abcehijlmoy
suhtaadressiga/acefijkly
sumedaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
sutenööriga/acefijkly
sängiga/acefijkly
sõlmjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
söölusega/abehklmny
sünkretistiga/acefijkly
taagiga/aceijly
tahtvusega/abehklmny
talmudiga/abcehijlmoy
taplevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
tavatsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
teisendeiga/acejl
teokaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
testriga/abcehijlmoy
tiksotroopiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
tituleerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tolmlevaga/abcdefgkmnoy
topitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
traaverseiga/acejl
trengiga/acefijkly
trotskistlikuga/acdegjlmy
tsingituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
tuhvleiga/acejl
tummisusega/abehklmny
turtsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
täidlusega/abehiklmny
tğeremissiga/acefijkly
tõrvjusega/abehklmny
töötlevusega/abehklmny
tüüfusega/abehiklmny
ujuga/acdeghimy
uputuslikuga/acdegjlmy
uvulaarsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
vahasega/abdehjklmnoy
vajukiga/abcehijlmoy
valsitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
varbitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
vastutavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
veiderdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vesistunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viibinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viivitlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vimmakusega/abehklmny
virvlejaga/abcdefgkmnoy
volitatuga/abcdefgikmoy
vulksuga/acdeghimy
välgutamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
väädituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
võistlevusega/abehklmny
võrmiga/acefijkly
ähklevusega/abehklmny
ğantaşeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
õhukusega/abehklmny
õrnutsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
üksusega/abehiklmny
